South Dakota, session 2026, HB1021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. The Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources may dismantle and demolish
buildings, dispose of resulting debris, repair infrastructure, and otherwise reclaim the grounds
associated with the following locations at the South Dakota State Fairgrounds in Huron:
(1) The barns on the corner of Livestock Avenue and Market Street; and
(2) The Quonset huts on Lincoln Avenue South.
Section 2. There is appropriated $337,000, in other fund expenditure authority, to the
Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources, for the purposes authorized in section 1 of
this Act.
Section 3. The Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources may accept, transfer, and
expend any moneys obtained for the projects authorized in this Act, from federal sources,
donations, or any other external sources. All moneys appropriated for the projects are subject
to the limitations set forth in sections 1 and 2 of this Act.
Section 4. The administration of the projects authorized in this Act shall be under the general
charge and supervision of the Bureau of Human Resources and Administration, as provided
in chapter 5-14.
Section 5. The secretary of the Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources shall
approve vouchers and the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized
in this Act.
Section 6. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.

26.441.12 2 1021
Section 7. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.
HB1021 ENROLLED

26.441.12 3 1021
An Act to authorize the Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources to dismantle and
demolish buildings on the South Dakota State Fairgrounds, to make an appropriation therefor,
and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1021
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1021 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1021 ENROLLED